Georgia, session 2025_26, SB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to physicians,
assistants, and others, is amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) of Code
Section 43-34-11, relating to continuing education requirement and required training for
physicians, to read as follows:
"(7) On and after January 1, 2026, all physicians shall be required to receive one hour of
education and training regarding maternal health, including preventive and emergency
care of pregnant and postpartum mothers as part of their continuing education
requirement."
S. B. 307
- 1 -

LC 52 0796
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 307
- 2 -